Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1448
Manufacturer-dealer agreement; contents; restrictions.

(1) A manufacturer-dealer agreement shall include:

(a) A designation of the area of sales responsibility assigned to the dealer;

(b) The timeframe for inspection and refusal to take delivery of a recreational vehicle by the dealer pursuant to section 60-1470. Such timeframe shall not be less than two business days after the physical delivery of the recreational vehicle;

(c) The terms of the manufacturer-dealer agreement; and

(d) The duration of the manufacturer-dealer agreement.

(2) A manufacturer-dealer agreement shall not:

(a) Include any provision that requires a party to violate the Recreational Vehicle Industry Regulation Act. Any such provision is null and void;

(b) Provide for the sale of a model or line-make that is already authorized to be sold by another dealer in the same area of sales responsibility; or

(c) Be changed during the duration of the manufacturer-dealer agreement without the written mutual consent of the parties, including the area of sales responsibility.

(3) A manufacturer shall not issue a policy or procedure that violates or substantially alters a provision of a manufacturer-dealer agreement during the duration of such agreement without the written mutual consent of the parties.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 7.
October 1, 2026